North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62A. Public Safety Telephone Service and Wireless Telephone Service.
Article 3. Emergency Telephone Service.

Recodified as Part 10 of Article 15 of Chapter 143B (G.S. 143B-1400 through 143B-1416).

§§ 62A-40 through 62A-56.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-1400 through 143B-1416 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.3(2), effective September 18, 2015.

§§ 62A-57,
62A-58.

Reserved for future codification purposes.